Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201881-3441
Use of title; unlawful practice.

Except as provided in sections 81-3414, 81-3415, 81-3449, and 81-3453, an individual shall not directly or indirectly engage in the practice of architecture or engineering in the state or use the title architect or professional engineer or display or use any words, letters, figures, titles, sign, card, advertisement, or other symbol or device indicating or tending to indicate that he or she is an architect or professional engineer or is practicing architecture or engineering unless he or she is licensed under the Engineers and Architects Regulation Act. A licensee shall not aid or abet any person not licensed under the act in the practice of architecture or engineering.

Laws 1997, LB 622, § 41;

Laws 2011, LB45, § 7;

Laws 2015, LB23, § 39.